Florida, session 2026, HB497.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 381.994, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.994 Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program—
(1)(a) There is created within the Department of Health
the Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program. The purpose of the
program is to advance the progress of research and cures for
neurofibromatosis by awarding grants through a competitive,
peer-reviewed process.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb497-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 497 2026
(b) Subject to an annual recurring appropriation of $5
million by the Legislature, the program shall award grants for
scientific and clinical research to further the search for new
diagnostics, treatments, and cures for neurofibromatosis.
(2)(a) Applications for grants for neurofibromatosis
disease research may be submitted by any university or
established research institute in the state. All qualified
investigators in the state, regardless of institutional
affiliation, shall have equal access and opportunity to compete
for the research funding. Preference may be given to grant
proposals that foster collaboration among institutions,
researchers, and community practitioners, as such proposals
support the advancement of treatments and cures of
neurofibromatosis through basic or applied research. Grants
shall be awarded by the department, after consultation with the
Rare Disease Advisory Council, pursuant to s. 381.99, on the
basis of scientific merit, as determined by the competitive,
peer-reviewed process to ensure objectivity, consistency, and
high quality. The following types of applications may be
considered for funding:
1. Investigator-initiated research grants.
2. Institutional research grants.
3. Collaborative research grants, including those that
advance the finding of treatment and cures through basic or
applied research.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb497-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 497 2026
(b) To ensure appropriate and fair evaluation of grant
applications based on scientific merit, the department shall
appoint peer review panels of independent, scientifically
qualified individuals to review the scientific merit of each
proposal and establish its priority score. The priority scores
shall be forwarded to the council and must be considered in
determining which proposals shall be recommended for funding.
(3) The Rare Disease Advisory Council and the peer review
panels shall establish and follow rigorous guidelines for
ethical conduct and adhere to a strict policy with regard to
conflicts of interest. A member of the council or panel may not
participate in any discussion or decision of the council or
panel with respect to a research proposal by any firm, entity,
or agency that the member is associated with as a member of the
governing body or as an employee or with which the member has
entered into a contractual arrangement.
(4) Notwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351,
the balance of any appropriation from the General Revenue Fund
for the Neurofibromatosis Disease Grant Program that is not
disbursed but that is obligated pursuant to contract or
committed to be expended by June 30 of the fiscal year in which
the funds are appropriated may be carried forward for up to 5
years after the effective date of the original appropriation.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb497-00